Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.120

Reduction of barriers for using local or private funds for early learning opportunities.

To the greatest extent possible, the department must reduce barriers and increase efficiency for using local or private funds, or both, to provide more high quality early learning opportunities.

[ 2017 c 178 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.215.112.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 c 178: See note following RCW 43.216.080.